Missouri, session 2026, SB1590.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 116.210, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 116.210,
to read as follows:
116.210. The secretary of state shall number proposed
constitutional amendments in the order in which they are
passed by the general assembly, or submitted by initiative
petition, or adopted by constitutional convention. He shall
number the first as "Constitutional Amendment No. 1" and so
on consecutively. A new series of numbers shall be started
after each general election that occurs in years ending in
eight.
✓